North Carolina statutes. Chapter 57C. North Carolina Limited Liability Company Act.
§§ 57C-1-01 through 57C-10-07.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2013-157, s. 1, effective January 1, 2014.

Cross References.

For present similar provisions, see Chapter 57D, the North Carolina Limited Liability Company Act,

G.S. 57D-1-01

et seq.

Editor’s Note.

Former G.S. 57C-1-22.1, 57C-1-22.1, 57C-1-23 through 57C-1-27, and 57C-1-29 were repealed by Session Laws 2001-358, s. 8(b), effective January 1, 2002.

Former G.S. 57C-2-30 through 57C-2-34 were repealed by Session Laws 2001-358, s. 30, effective January 1, 2002.

Former G.S. 57C-2-41, 57C-2-42, and 57C-7-08 through 57C-7-10 were repealed by Session Laws 2001-358, s. 49(c), effective January 1, 2002.

Former G.S. 57C-6-03.1 was repealed by Session Laws 1998-228, s. 17, effective December 1, 1999.

Former G.S. 57C-6-06.1 was repealed by Session Laws 2009-247, s. 7, effective January 1, 2010.

Former G.S. 57C-7-06 was repealed by Session Laws 2001-358, s. 29, effective January 1, 2002.

Former G.S. 57C-9-01 through 57C-9-06 were repealed by Session Laws 1999-369, s. 3.7, effective December 15, 1999.

G.S. 57C-1-04 through 57C-1-19, 57C-2-03 through 57C-2-19, 57C-2-24 through 57C-2-29, 57C-2-35 through 57C-2-39, 57C-3-06 through 57C-3-19, 57C-3-26 through 57C-3-29, 57C-9A-05 through 57C-9A-09, 57C-9A-14 through 57C-9A-19, and 57C-9A-24 through 57C-9A-29 were formerly reserved for future codification purposes.